Utah statutes.
3-1-34.   Quorum at meeting to vote on plan of merger or consolidation.
The current members present or voting by signed ballot, if voting by ballot is
allowed by the association's bylaws, of each cooperative association which is
a party to the merger  or consolidation and the shareholders present  or
voting by proxy or by delegate of each noncooperative corporation which is a
party to the merger or consolidation shall constitute a quorum at the meeting
called to vote upon the merger or consolidation unless the plan requires a
greater number to constitute a quorum at the meeting.
